Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-3306
Nebraska Rules of the Road; how construed.

Subject to section 60-3302, the Nebraska Rules of the Road shall not be construed as requiring a conventional human driver to operate a driverless-capable vehicle that is being operated by an automated driving system, and the automated driving system of such vehicle, when engaged, shall be deemed to fulfill any physical acts required of a conventional human driver to perform the dynamic driving task.

Laws 2018, LB989, § 6.

Nebraska Rules of the Road, see section 60-601.